Maryland, session 2025, SB0578.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0578*

SENATE BILL 578
8–201.
There is a Maryland Home Improvement Commission in the Department.
8–401.
In this subtitle, “actual loss” means the costs of restoration, repair, replacement, or
completion that arise from an unworkmanlike, inadequate, or incomplete home
improvement.
8–403.
(a) The Commission shall:
(1) establish a Home Improvement Guaranty Fund;
(2) keep the Fund at a level of at least $1,000,000; and
(3) submit a report detailing actions being taken to restore the balance of
the Fund to a sustainable level to the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the
Environment and the House Economic Matters Committee within 30 days of projecting that
the Fund balance will be less than $1,000,000.
8–405.
(a) Subject to this subtitle, an owner may recover compensation from the Fund
for an actual loss that results from an act or omission by a licensed contractor or a violation
of § 8–607(4) of this title as found by the Commission or a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) For purposes of recovery from the Fund, the act or omission of a licensed
contractor includes the act or omission of a subcontractor, salesperson, or employee of the
licensed contractor, whether or not an express agency relationship exists.
(e) The Commission may not award from the Fund:
(1) more than $30,000 to one claimant for acts or omissions of one
contractor;
(2) more than $250,000 to all claimants for acts or omissions of one
contractor unless, after the Commission has paid out $250,000 on account of acts or
omissions of the contractor, the contractor reimburses $250,000 to the Fund;
(3) an amount for [attorney fees,] consequential damages, court costs,
interest, personal injury damages, or punitive damages;

SENATE BILL 578 3
(4) AN AMOUNT FOR ATTORNEY’S FEES GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT
AWARDED FOR THE ACTUAL LOSS RESULTING FROM THE ACTS OR OMISSIONS OF
THE CONTRACTOR, PROVIDED THAT THE TOTAL AMOUNT AWARDED TO A CLAIMANT
DOES NOT EXCEED $30,000;
(5) an amount as a result of a default judgment in court; or
[(5)] (6) an amount in excess of the amount paid by or on behalf of the
claimant to the contractor against whom the claim is filed.
8–409.
(a) The Commission may order payment of a claim against the Fund only if:
(1) the decision or order of the Commission is final in accordance with Title
10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article and all rights of appeal are exhausted; or
(2) the claimant provides the Commission with a certified copy of a final
judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction or a final award in arbitration, with all rights
of appeal exhausted, in which the court or arbitrator:
(i) [expressly] has found on the merits that the claimant is entitled
to recover under COMPENSATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–405(a) of this subtitle; and
(ii) has found the value of the actual loss.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.